Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1004

Voluntary dissolution before commencement of activity.

A majority of the organizers or initial directors of a limited cooperative association that has not yet begun business activity or the conduct of its affairs may dissolve the association.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1004.]